Maryland, session 2025, HB1412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
19–108.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING TERMS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LOCAL JURISDICTION” MEANS A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION.
(3) (I) “PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM” MEANS ANY
PUBLICLY FUNDED BENEFIT PROGRAM THAT A RECIPIENT CAN USE TO PURCHASE
FOOD.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1412*

HOUSE BILL 1412
(II) “PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM” INCLUDES:
1. THE FEDERAL SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (SNAP);
2. THE STATE FAMILY INVESTMENT PROGRAM (FIP);
3. THE FEDERAL WOMEN, INFANTS, AND CHILDREN
PROGRAM (WIC); AND
4. ANY OTHER PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES PUBLICLY
FUNDED ASSISTANCE THAT CAN BE USED TO PURCHASE FOOD.
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A LOCAL JURISDICTION
MAY NOT ADOPT OR ENFORCE A LAW OR AN ORDINANCE THAT REQUIRES A RETAIL
ESTABLISHMENT TO CHARGE AND COLLECT A FEE, A TAX, OR ANY OTHER CHARGE
FOR THE USE OF A CARRYOUT BAG AT THE POINT OF SALE UNLESS THE LAW OR
ORDINANCE:
(I) WAS IN EFFECT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025; AND
(II) REQUIRES THAT REVENUE GENERATED FROM THE SALE OF
CARRYOUT BAGS BE PAID TO THE LOCAL JURISDICTION TO BE USED ONLY FOR
ENVIRONMENTAL SUPPORT PURPOSES.
(2) A LOCAL JURISDICTION AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION TO
REQUIRE RETAIL ESTABLISHMENTS TO CHARGE AND COLLECT A FEE, A TAX, OR ANY
OTHER CHARGE FOR THE USE OF A CARRYOUT BAG AT THE POINT OF SALE SHALL
REQUIRE RETAIL ESTABLISHMENTS TO EXEMPT FROM THE CHARGE ANY CUSTOMER:
(I) USING FUNDS FROM A PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM TO
PAY FOR ALL OR PART OF THEIR PURCHASE; OR
(II) WHO IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.